Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.300

Incumbent. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an elected office.

[ 2024 c 164 s 230.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.